Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-364
Cost of patient care; liability of patient and relatives.

When any person is admitted to a state institution or other inpatient treatment facility pursuant to an order of a mental health board under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act or receives treatment prescribed by such institution or facility following release or without being admitted as a resident patient, the patient and the patient's relatives shall be liable for the cost of the care, support, maintenance, and treatment of such person to the extent and in the manner provided by sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379. Such sections also shall apply to persons admitted to a state institution as transferees from any state penal institution or youth rehabilitation and treatment center but only after the expiration of the time for which the transferees were originally sentenced or committed.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 2, p. 3052;

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 30;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 140;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 102;

Laws 2021, LB273, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 33.
July 18, 2026
For other provisions relating to patient expenses, see sections 83-348 to 83-355.

Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act, see section 71-901.

Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.